Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 5 Compensation and Benefits
21-5-202. Legislative intent.

It is the purpose and intent of this subchapter to establish uniform classifications for all affected state employees of agencies, boards, commissions, and institutions of higher education covered by the provisions of this subchapter and to establish a uniform compensation plan to be followed by the agencies, boards, commissions, and institutions of higher education, with respect to the authorized positions of their employees.

It is the purpose of this subchapter to implement the administration and enforcement of the uniform position classification and compensation plan provided for affected agencies and institutions in accordance with sound business management practices.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 199, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3202; Acts 1989, No. 793, § 1.

21-5-203. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Agency director” means the executive head of all agencies, authorities, departments, boards, commissions, bureaus, councils, or other agencies of the state;

“Class” or “classification” means a group of positions sufficiently similar as to duties performed, scope of discretion and responsibility, minimum requirements of training and experience or skill, and other characteristics that the same title, the same test of fitness, and the same scale of compensation have been or may be applied to each position in the group;

“Class specification” means a written document which identifies a group of positions that have the same type of work and responsibility and states the general components by providing a class title, class code, distinguishing features and examples of work, knowledge, skills, and abilities, and the necessary minimum education and experience requirements to perform the assigned duties;

“Crossgrade” means a temporary reclassification of a position during the fiscal year.

The Office of Personnel Management may authorize a temporary change in the classification of a position from the classification authorized in a state agency appropriation act between legislative sessions to assure correct classification and for other purposes.

The Office of Personnel Management shall establish the procedures for crossgrades with review by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee;

“Demotion” means the change in duty assignment of an employee from a position in one classification to a position in another classification of a lower salary grade within the same pay table;

“Employee” means a person regularly appointed or employed in a position of state service by a state agency for which:

He or she is compensated on a full-time basis or on a pro rata basis; and

A class title and pay grade is established in the appropriation act for the state agency in accordance with the classification and compensation plan enacted in this subchapter;

“Entry pay level” means the minimum entrance salary rate for a grade established on a pay table;

“Grade” means an authorized pay range;

“Job sharing” means a form of employment, approved by the Office of Personnel Management, in which the hours of work of two (2) or more persons are arranged in such a way as to cover a single, regular full-time position;

“Maximum pay level” means the highest authorized level of pay for a pay grade for normal compensation administration purposes;

“Midpoint” means the rate of pay midway between the entry pay level and the maximum pay level established for each grade;

“Office of Personnel Management” means the Office of Personnel Management within the Department of Transformation and Shared Services acting under the authority granted in this subchapter and subject to the direction of the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services;

“Pay table” means the grades and pay ranges assigned to one (1) of the General Salaries, Information Technology, Medical Professional, and Senior Executive tables;

“Position” means employment that is legislatively authorized in a state agency, occupied or vacant, requiring the services of one (1) full-time equivalent employee;

“Promotion” means the change in duty assignment of an employee from a position in one classification to a position in another classification of a higher salary grade within the same pay table;

“Reclassification” means a change in the assignment of a position from one classification title to another classification title of either a higher or lower salary grade when material and permanent changes in the duties and responsibilities of the position being recommended for reclassification have occurred or when it is necessary to establish a new classification title to meet federal standards as a prerequisite for federal programs.

The Office of Personnel Management shall establish procedures for reclassifying positions with review by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee;

“State agencies” means all agencies, authorities, departments, boards, commissions, bureaus, councils, or other agencies of the state supported by appropriation of state or federal funds, except those agencies excluded in § 21-5-204;

“State Personnel Administrator” means the State Personnel Administrator of the Office of Personnel Management; and

“Transfer” means a change in duty assignment of an employee from one position to another position in the same classification or between pay tables.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Pay level” for “Step” in (11).

The 2001 amendment repealed former (13) and rearranged the subdivisions in alphabetical order; redesignated former (9)(A) as (9)(A)(i) and (9)(A)(ii); in (9)(A)(i) and (9)(A)(ii), added “or extra help” following “full-time” and substituted “positions” for “position”; inserted “whether permanent or temporary” in (9)(A)(ii); and made stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment deleted “‘Agency head’ or” at the beginning of (1); inserted (2) through (4), (7), (10), (15), and (16), deleted former (10) and (18), and redesignated accordingly; inserted “or ‘classification’” in (5); deleted “requiring fewer qualifications such as lower skill requirements, less job-related experience, and a lower level of responsibility” at the end of (8); subdivided (9) and inserted “or on a pro rata basis” in (9)(A); in (11), inserted “an authorized” in (11)(A) and inserted (11)(B); rewrote (14); inserted “or ‘office’” in (18); rewrote (20); in (21), deleted “requiring higher qualifications, such as greater skill and longer experience, and involving a higher level of responsibility” at the end of (21), and deleted (21)(B); inserted (22)(E); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment inserted “or more” preceding “persons” in (14)(A)(i).

The 2017 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment, in (12), substituted “Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Division of Management Services of the Department of Finance and Administration” and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration”.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 199, § 3; 1971, No. 750, § 1; 1973, No. 873, § 2; 1979, No. 828, § 1; 1981, No. 198, § 1; 1981, No. 650, § 1; 1985, No. 981, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3203; Acts 1989, No. 793, § 2; 1991, No. 994, §§ 1-3; 1991, No. 1148, § 1; 1997, No. 179, § 33; 1999, No. 1019, § 1; 2001, No. 1461, §§ 1, 2; 2009, No. 688, § 4; 2011, No. 1017, § 1; 2017, No. 365, § 8; 2019, No. 981, § 2.

21-5-204. Exceptions.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this subchapter does not apply to:

The employees of:

Elected constitutional officers of this state;

The General Assembly, including employees of the Bureau of Legislative Research and Arkansas Legislative Audit; and

Members of the Supreme Court, the Court of Appeals, circuit courts, prosecuting attorneys, and the Administrative Office of the Courts;

The Arkansas Department of Transportation;

Federal military technicians, military training support personnel, federally funded personnel of the Arkansas National Guard, and other military personnel who are paid directly by the federal government;

The Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission; and

State-supported institutions of higher education.

An employee described in subsection (a) of this section may receive:

A salary increase or a line item maximum increase under § 21-5-211; and

A merit pay increase under § 21-5-1101.

Section 21-5-214 does not apply to the salary increase authorized by subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (a), substituted “Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section” for “The provisions of,” substituted “does not” for “shall not,” and deleted “the following agencies” following “apply to”; inserted “employees of” in (a)(1); inserted the (a)(1)(A) designation and deleted “and their employees” at the end; redesignated former (a)(2) and (3) as (a)(1)(B) and (C); deleted “and its employees” following “General Assembly” in (a)(1)(B); deleted “and employees” following “members” in (a)(1)(C); redesignated (a)(4) and (5) as (a)(2) and (3); and added (c).

The 2017 amendment by No. 365 substituted “subsection (b)” for “subsection (c)” in the introductory language of (a); added (a)(4) and (a)(5); deleted former (b); redesignated former (c)(1) and (2) as (b)(1) and (2); deleted “or subsection (b)” following “subsection (a)” in (b)(1); substituted “or a line item maximum increase” for “a line item maximum increase, or a cost-of-living adjustment” in (b)(1)(A); and, in (b)(2), deleted “line item maximum increase, or cost-of-living adjustment” following “increase” and substituted “(b)(1)(A)” for “(c)(1)(A)”.

The 2017 amendment by No. 707 substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (a)(2).

When a higher salary grade level is authorized in this subchapter for classifications which are not reflected in the appropriation action of a state agency, this subchapter shall set the salary grade levels to be authorized in a state agency's appropriation act for the biennium unless special language in the appropriation act of a state agency allows the state agency to provide salary increases other than that provided in this subchapter.

It is the intent of this section that the respective state agencies governed by the provisions of this subchapter be authorized to allow salary grade levels as provided in the appropriation acts of the state agencies, provided that the rules which apply to salary increases under the provisions of this subchapter shall not be waived unless special language in the appropriation act of the state agency authorizes the state agency to provide increases other than those authorized under the provisions of this subchapter.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “state agencies” for “agencies and institutions of higher education” and “state agency” for “agency or institution”, and made similar changes throughout the section; and substituted “governed by the provisions of this subchapter” for “governed by it” in (a).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 199, § 3; 1979, No. 828, § 1; 1981, No. 198, § 1; 1981, No. 650, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3203; Acts 1989, No. 793, § 3; 2015, No. 1007, § 1; 2017, No. 365, § 9; 2017, No. 707, §
72.

21-5-205. Effect on appropriation acts.

All appropriation acts of all state agencies subject to the provisions of this subchapter shall be governed by the provisions of this subchapter with respect to grades, class titles, salary increases, salary increase eligibility, and other provisions unless special language in the appropriation act of the state agency specifically allows the state agency to provide salary increases, grade assignments, class title assignments, salary increase eligibility, and other provisions different from those provided by this subchapter.

Where the intent of the General Assembly, by amendment to appropriation bills, is to allow a higher grade for a classification than that listed in this subchapter, the grade assigned to the classification in the appropriation act for the classification, as designated with the higher grade level, shall be the grade level for the classification in the state agency during the biennium.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 199, § 7; 1973, No. 873, § 8; 1975, No. 932, § 4; 1979, No. 828, § 4; 1981, No. 650, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-3207, 12-3209; Acts 1989, No. 793, § 4; 2017, No. 365, § 10.

21-5-206. Legislative Council — Duties.

In order to assist the General Assembly in more efficiently performing its constitutional duty, that being “… the number and salaries of the clerks and employees of the different departments of the State shall be fixed by law”, the Legislative Council shall:

Review the establishment and implementation of new classification titles proposed between legislative sessions due to program changes;

Review the staffing levels of all agencies covered by this subchapter and submit to the General Assembly, when in regular session, fiscal session, or special session, recommendations for revisions, modifications, or additions thereto;

Conduct, when necessary, salary surveys of the private and public sector of jobs comparable to those contained in § 21-5-208 for purposes of establishing equitable and competitive rates of compensation for employees occupying positions affected by this subchapter;

Periodically review and recommend any changes found necessary in the job evaluation system used to set salary grade levels for all classifications affected by this section and forward the recommendations to the Office of Personnel Management; and

Prepare and submit recommendations for revisions in this subchapter to the General Assembly when in session.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The language quoted in the introductory paragraph of this section is from Arkansas Constitution, Article 16, § 4.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted “session, fiscal session” following “regular” in (2).

The 2017 amendment deleted “any” preceding “new” in (1); substituted “covered by” for “and institutions covered by the provisions of” in (2); and deleted “the provisions of” preceding “this section” in (4).

Cross References. Legislative Council, §10-3-301 et seq.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 981, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3212; Acts 1989, No. 793, § 5; 2009, No. 962, § 40; 2017, No. 365, § 11.